Maryland, session 2026, HB1079.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
SUBTITLE 42. OFFICE OF REGULATORY MANAGEMENT.
9–4201.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1079*

HOUSE BILL 1079
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “OFFICE” MEANS THE OFFICE OF REGULATORY MANAGEMENT.
(C) “REGULATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 10–101 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
9–4202.
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE ARE IN ADDITION TO THE
REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS ARTICLE.
9–4203.
(A) THERE IS AN OFFICE OF REGULATORY MANAGEMENT.
(B) (1) THE HEAD OF THE OFFICE IS THE DIRECTOR.
(2) THE DIRECTOR:
(I) SHALL BE APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR WITH THE ADVICE
AND CONSENT OF THE SENATE; AND
(II) IS ENTITLED TO THE SALARY PROVIDED IN THE STATE
BUDGET.
(C) THE OFFICE SHALL HAVE THE STAFF PROVIDED FOR IN THE STATE
BUDGET.
9–4204.
ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE OFFICE SHALL DEVELOP POLICIES
AND PROCEDURES FOR:
(1) THE OVERSIGHT AND IMPLEMENTATION OF A 25% REDUCTION IN
REGULATORY REQUIREMENTS;
(2) THE OVERSIGHT AND IMPLEMENTATION OF THE STREAMLINING
OF THE REGULATORY AND PERMITTING APPROVAL PROCESS OF ALL UNITS OF
STATE GOVERNMENT TO ACHIEVE A SUBSTANTIAL REDUCTION IN THE TIME

HOUSE BILL 1079 3
REQUIRED FOR APPROVAL OR REJECTION OF PERMITS, LICENSES,
CERTIFICATIONS, AND REGISTRATIONS; AND
(3) THE INCREASED TRANSPARENCY OF THE STATE REGULATORY
PROCESS.
9–4205.
ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER, EACH UNIT OF
STATE GOVERNMENT SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE OFFICE AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE JOINT COMMITTEE ON
ADMINISTRATIVE, EXECUTIVE, AND LEGISLATIVE REVIEW LISTING ALL
REGULATIONS THAT THE UNIT ANTICIPATES AMENDING, ADOPTING, OR REPEALING
DURING THE NEXT FISCAL YEAR.
9–4206.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AUTHORIZATION” MEANS A PERMIT, LICENSE, CERTIFICATION,
REGISTRATION, OR ANY OTHER INSTRUMENT THAT A PERSON IS REQUIRED TO
OBTAIN FROM A UNIT BEFORE ENGAGING IN A PARTICULAR ACTIVITY.
(3) “AVERAGE PROCESSING DURATION” MEANS THE AMOUNT OF
TIME IN THE PREVIOUS FISCAL YEAR THAT A UNIT TAKES TO FULLY PROCESS ANY
GIVEN APPLICATION FOR AN AUTHORIZATION.
(4) “LOW–VOLUME AUTHORIZATION” MEANS AN AUTHORIZATION
FOR WHICH A UNIT RECEIVES AN AVERAGE OF FEWER THAN FIVE APPLICATIONS PER
YEAR.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO UNITS IN THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH OF
STATE GOVERNMENT.
(C) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, EACH UNIT SHALL SUBMIT A
REPORT TO THE OFFICE CONTAINING:
(1) FOR EACH AUTHORIZATION, INFORMATION ON:
(I) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF APPLICATIONS PROCESSED
ANNUALLY;

HOUSE BILL 1079
(II) THE AVERAGE PROCESSING TIME;
(III) ANY FEES OR CHARGES ASSOCIATED WITH THE
AUTHORIZATION;
(IV) ANY INVOLVEMENT OF ANOTHER FEDERAL, STATE, OR
LOCAL GOVERNMENT ENTITY IN THE AUTHORIZATION PROCESS, INCLUDING THE
AVERAGE PROCESSING DURATION BY EACH ENTITY;
(V) THE PROVISION OF LAW THAT MANDATES OR AUTHORIZES
THE AUTHORIZATION;
(VI) INFORMATION ON WHETHER THE APPLICATION, FEE
PAYMENT, AND OTHER RELEVANT DETAILS MAY BE COMPLETED ONLINE;
(VII) WHETHER THE AUTHORIZATION HAS A TARGET
PROCESSING TIME OF 15 DAYS OR LESS;
(VIII) WHETHER THE AUTHORIZATION INVOLVES MORE THAN ONE
PROCEDURAL STEP; AND
(IX) IF THE AUTHORIZATION IS A LOW–VOLUME
AUTHORIZATION, A RECOMMENDATION ON WHETHER THE AUTHORIZATION SHOULD
BE ELIMINATED;
(2) A CERTIFICATION THAT THE UNIT HAS, FOR EACH
AUTHORIZATION:
(I) ASSIGNED STAFF TO BE RESPONSIBLE FOR THE
AUTHORIZATION;
(II) DEVELOPED A PROCESS FOR EACH AUTHORIZATION;
(III) IMPLEMENTED A SYSTEM TO TRACK THE DURATION TIME
FOR THE PROCESSING OF AN APPLICATION; AND
(IV) ESTABLISHED A STANDARDIZED INTERNAL PROCESS FOR
APPLICATION REVIEW; AND
(3) A STRATEGY TO SIMPLIFY EXISTING AUTHORIZATIONS,
INCLUDING:

HOUSE BILL 1079 5
(I) REDUCING THE NUMBER OF PROCEDURAL STAGES IN THE
AUTHORIZATION PROCESS;
(II) CONVERTING INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZATIONS TO GENERAL
AUTHORIZATIONS WHERE PERMISSIBLE BY REGULATORY, STATUTORY, OR
ADMINISTRATIVE AUTHORITY; AND
(III) REDUCING THE OVERALL NUMBER OF AUTHORIZATIONS.
(D) ON OR BEFORE APRIL 1, 2027, AND QUARTERLY THEREAFTER, EACH
UNIT SHALL SUBMIT AN UPDATE TO THE REPORT DESCRIBING ANY PROGRESS THE
UNIT HAS MADE IN IMPLEMENTING THE STRATEGY OUTLINED IN THE REPORT.
(E) EACH UNIT, IN COORDINATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY, SHALL DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT PROCESSES FOR:
(1) SUBMITTING APPLICATIONS FOR AUTHORIZATIONS ONLINE;
(2) PROCESSING PAYMENTS ELECTRONICALLY; AND
(3) AMENDING PENDING APPLICATIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.